Washington statutes.
RCW 11.60.010

Order for performance on application of personal representative.

If any person, who is bound by contract, in writing, shall die before performing said contract, the superior court of the county in which the estate is being administered, may upon application of the personal representative, without notice, make an order authorizing and directing the personal representative to perform such contract.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.60.010. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 188; RRS s 1558; prior: 1891 p 390 s 40; Code 1881 s 623; 1877 p 130 s 626; 1854 p 292 s 150.]